Hawaii statutes.
§206-21 Contracts. The board of land
and natural resources, in addition to its other powers, may make, execute, and
carry out contracts for, or in connection with, any project in the name of the
State, in the manner provided in chapter 103D and section 103-53; and, with
regard to such contracts, the term "officers", as used in chapter
103D, means the board or such officer as is authorized by the board to act as
its contracting officer. Each contract authorized in this section shall state
that it is made and executed in the name of the State. [L 1961, c 6, §19; Supp,
§98J-19; HRS §206-21; am L Sp 1993, c 8, §56]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next